Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB692.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "exotic wildlife" in section 2961 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2961. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Exotic wildlife." [The phrase includes, but is not limited to, all bears, coyotes, lions, tigers, leopards, jaguars, cheetahs, cougars, wolves and any crossbreed of these animals which have similar characteristics in appearance or features. The definition is applicable whether or not the birds or animals 123456789101112131415161718 were bred or reared in captivity or imported from another state or nation.] As follows:(1) The term includes all nonindigenous animals and the following, regardless of whether the animal is bred or reared in captivity or imported from another state or nation:(i) All members of the order Primates (nonhuman primates).(ii) All members of the family Ursidae (bears).(iii) Members of the following species:(A) Canis latrans (coyotes).(B) Canis lupus (gray wolves).(C) Canis rufus (red wolves).(D) Felis rufus (bobcats).(E) Panthera leo (lions).(F) Panthera tigris (tigers).(G) Panthera pardus (leopards).(H) Panthera uncia (snow leopards).(I) Neofelis nebulosa (clouded leopards).(J) Panthera onca (jaguars).(K) Acinonyx jubatus (cheetahs).(L) Felis concolor (cougars).(iv) Any crossbreed of an animal specified in subparagraph (iii) which have similar characteristics in appearance or features.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) Any member of the class Aves (birds).(ii) Any member of the following families:(A) Equidae (horses, asses and zebras).(B) Camelidae (camels, alpacas and llamas).(C) Cervidae (deer, moose and elk).20250HB0692PN0708 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) Bovidae (wild cattle and spiral-horned antelopes).(E) Muridae (rats and mice).(F) Chinchillidae (chinchillas and viscachas).(G) Leporidae (rabbits and hares).(H) Erinaceidae (hedgehogs and moonrats).(I) Petauridae (gliders and striped possums).(iii) Any member of the species Mustela furo (domestic ferrets).(iv) Any member of the species Cavia porcellus (domestic guinea pigs).(v) Any domestic animal, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5531 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0692PN0708 - 3 - 123456789101112131415